Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-219
Control of advertising outside of right-of-way; erected prior to March 27, 1972; effect.

Outdoor advertising signs, displays, and devices erected prior to March 27, 1972, may continue in zoned or unzoned commercial or industrial areas, notwithstanding the fact that such outdoor advertising signs, displays, and devices do not comply with standards and criteria established by sections 39-212 to 39-222 or rules and regulations of the Department of Transportation.

Laws 1972, LB 1181, § 9;

Laws 1994, LB 848, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1994, § 39-1320.08;

Laws 1995, LB 264, § 13;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 100.

An injunction may properly be entered to require compliance with the statute making it unlawful to erect or maintain advertising signs along highways prior to determination of whether there is a right to damages resulting from application of the statute. State v. Mayhew Products Corp., 204 Neb. 266, 281 N.W.2d 783 (1979).

Sections 39-1320 to 39-1320.11 constitute a reasonable and valid exercise of the police power which bears a substantial relation to the public health, safety, and general welfare, and are constitutional. State v. Mayhew Products Corp., 204 Neb. 266, 281 N.W.2d 783 (1979).